Missouri, session 2026, HB2197.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 168.410, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 168.410 and 168.411, to read as follows:
168.410. 1. As used in this section and section 168.411, "building-level
administrator" means a school official who supervises or evaluates other licensed staff.
A building-level administrator may be a principal or an assistant principal.
2. School administrators [and], school district superintendents, and building-level
administrators shall be evaluated in the following manner:
(1) The board of education of each school district shall cause a comprehensive
performance-based evaluation for each administrator employed by the district. Such
evaluation shall be ongoing, specific, and of sufficient specificity and frequency to provide
for demonstrated standards of competency and academic ability;
(2) All evaluations shall be:
(a) Maintained in the respective administrator's personnel file at the office of the
board of education of the school district. A copy of each evaluation shall be provided to the
person being evaluated and to the appropriate administrator;
(b) Conducted using research-based evaluation tools that align with best
practices; and
(c) Based on multiple rating categories that include student growth and
assessment data as a factor in performance ratings; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2197 2
(3) The state department of elementary and secondary education shall provide
suggested procedures for the evaluations performed under this section.
168.411. 1. As used in this section, "nonrenewal" or "nonrenewed" means, when
referring to a contract of a building-level administrator, such contract is not extended
beyond the current term provided for in such contract.
2. (1) Each school district employing a building-level administrator shall
provide written notification of contract renewal or nonrenewal no later than February
fifteenth in the year the contract expires. If written notice is not given by the deadline,
such failure on the part of the school district constitutes reemployment on the same
terms and in the same building-level administrator position as those provided in the
contract of the current fiscal year for an additional one-year period.
(2) No building-level administrator's contract shall be nonrenewed without such
building-level administrator being evaluated at least once in the contract year as
required under section 168.410.
(3) A building-level administrator whose contract is nonrenewed shall be
provided with written cause in accordance with subsection 3 of this section.
(4) (a) A school district shall present a contract to each building-level
administrator whose contract has been renewed.
(b) The building-level administrator shall accept or reject such contract in
writing within fifteen business days after receiving the contract.
3. (1) A building-level administrator's contract shall not be nonrenewed except
for cause. For purposes of this subsection, "for cause" includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Unsatisfactory performance as determined through the annual evaluation
process required in section 168.410;
(b) Violation of school district policies or state laws; or
(c) Conduct detrimental to the operation of the school district or a public school
in such district.
(2) Any building-level administrator reemployed for five consecutive years
within a school district shall have the right to request a written statement of reasons for
nonrenewal of such building-level administrator's contract within ten business days
after receiving such nonrenewal notice. The school district shall provide the reasons for
such nonrenewal in writing within ten business days of receipt of the request.
(3) A building-level administrator who receives such nonrenewal notice has the
right to:
(a) Request a closed-session hearing before the school board within ten business
days of receiving the notice;
(b) Present evidence, testimony, and cross-examine witnesses; and

HB 2197 3
(c) Be represented by counsel if desired.
(4) The school board shall issue a final decision within thirty business days after
the hearing.
4. (1) A building-level administrator dismissed during an active contract term is
entitled to due process including, but not limited to:
(a) Written notice of the reason for dismissal;
(b) The opportunity to present the building-level administrator's case before the
school board; and
(c) A hearing conducted in compliance with state statutes and procedural due
process rights.
(2) A building-level administrator may file an appeal if nonrenewal or dismissal
violates:
(a) State law governing building-level administrator contracts; or
(b) School district policies regarding performance evaluations and contract
renewals.
✔